Utah statutes.
13-15-5.   Disclosure statement furnished to buyer -- Contents.

All the information required under Section 13-15-4 shall be contained in a single disclosure statement or prospectus which shall be provided to any prospective purchaser at least 10 business days prior to the earlier of:

(1)  the execution by prospective purchaser of any agreement imposing a binding legal obligation on such prospective purchaser by which the seller knows or should know, in connection with the sale or proposed sale of the "assisted marketing plan"; or

(2)  the payment by a prospective purchaser, by which the seller knows or should know of any consideration in connection with the sale or proposed sale of the "assisted market plan."  The disclosure statement or prospectus may not contain any material or information other than that required under Section 13-15-4.  However, the seller may give prospective purchasers nondeceptive information other than that contained in the disclosure statement or prospectus if it does not contradict the information required to appear in the disclosure statement or prospectus.  A cover sheet attached to the disclosure statement or prospectus shall conspicuously state the name of the seller, the date of issuance of the disclosure statement or prospectus, and a notice printed in not less than 12 point upper and lower case boldface type as follows:

INFORMATION FOR PURCHASE OF A MARKETING PLAN:

To protect you, the State Division of Consumer Protection has required your seller to give you this information.  The State Division of Consumer Protection has not verified this information as to its accuracy. The notice may contain additional precautions deemed necessary and pertinent.  The seller, in lieu of the information requested by Section 13-15-4, may file with the commission and provide to prospective purchasers certified disclosure documents authorized for use by the Federal Trade Commission pursuant to Title 16, Chapter I, Subchapter d, Trade Regulation Rules, Part 436, "Disclosure Requirements and Prohibitions Concerning Franchising and Business Opportunity Ventures."

